California, session 20252026, AB2467.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44320 of the Education Code is amended to read:44320. (a) Professional preparation, including student teaching, shall be made available in the upper division course offerings at all California public institutions of higher learning, except the California Maritime Academy and the college named in Section 92200. College of the Law, San Francisco. No more than nine semester units, or the equivalent, of professional education courses may be designated as prerequisites for purposes of admission to student teaching, except that, to satisfy the English language requirement as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, candidates may be required to take 12 semester units, or the equivalent, as professional education prerequisites to student teaching.(b) The commission shall encourage postsecondary institutions of higher education that offer programs of professional preparation to collaborate with school districts, county offices of education, and professional organizations in the design and delivery of local programs to function as part of the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program pursuant to Section 44279.2. If local educational agencies and institutions of higher education voluntarily agree to implement the program, the following provisions shall apply to each collaborative effort:(1) Postsecondary institutions Institutions of higher education and local educational agencies shall coordinate and articulate the program of professional preparation and the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program, so the two programs provide continuity in the preparation, support, and assessment of beginning teachers.(2) At the discretion of a postsecondary an institution of higher education that participates in a collaborative effort, the program of professional preparation may be submitted to the commission for approval as a program of preparation, support, and assessment that is at least two years long.(3) In each program of preparation, support, and assessment, the postsecondary institution of higher education shall make it possible for each candidate to complete all requirements for a valid teaching credential in the equivalent of one year of full-time study.(4) A postsecondary An institution of higher education that participates in a collaborative effort may, at its discretion, determine that successful completion of the support and assessment components of an articulated program of professional preparation, support, and assessment fulfills some or all of the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 44259, and may accordingly recommend applicants for the professional teaching credential. The standards and criteria for making these determinations and recommendations shall be included in the institution’s proposal for a program.(5) A local educational agency that collaborates, at its own discretion, with a postsecondary education an institution of higher education in the design and delivery of an articulated program of professional preparation, support, and assessment that meets the standards and criteria pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44279.2, and that receives funds pursuant to the annual Budget Act, may contract with the postsecondary institution of higher education to pay the institution’s costs of designing and delivering the support and assessment components of the program.(c) Local educational agencies that are approved by the commission to provide programs of personalized preparation to candidates for designated subjects teaching credentials are encouraged to participate in the design and delivery of local programs under the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.2), in a manner consistent with subdivision (b).(d) (1) Before admission to either student teaching under any professional preparation program approved by the commission, or participation in a field experience program as described in Section 44324, a candidate for a credential shall obtain a commission for a multiple subject credential, single subject credential, PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential, or education specialist credential, a candidate shall provide verification to the professional preparation program that one of the following holds true for the candidate:(A) The candidate holds a valid permit or credential previously issued by the commission.(B) The candidate has applied for a certificate of clearance from the commission which that shall be issued when the commission has verified the candidate’s personal identification and health status. The(2) Before beginning student teaching, clinic practice, or participation in a field experience program as described in Section 44324, a candidate described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall have obtained the certificate of clearance. The fee for the certificate of clearance shall not exceed one-half of the regular fee for a credential and shall be deducted from the fee for the initial credential applied for by the certificate holder.(e) A professional preparation program approved by the commission for a multiple subject credential, single subject credential, PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential, or education specialist credential shall do all of the following:(1) (A) Submit candidate profile information to the commission for each enrolled credential candidate within 30 days of the candidate beginning the program.(B) The candidate profile information shall include, but not be limited to, the candidate’s credential program, type of credential being sought, and preparation pathway, including residency, student teaching, internship, or other preparation pathway, as determined by the commission.(2) Annually update each candidate’s profile information described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) to indicate continued enrollment in, or departure from, the program.(3) Indicate to the commission a candidate’s program completion within 30 days of the candidate completing all credential requirements.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 48204.3 of the Education Code is amended to read:48204.3. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Active military duty” means full-time military duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the California National Guard and the State Guard on active duty orders pursuant to Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code or Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 2 of the Military and Veterans Code.(2) “Military installation” means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, home port facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the United States Coast Guard.(3) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive parent or guardian of a dependent child.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil complies with the residency requirements for school attendance in a school district, if the pupil is a pupil whose parent is transferred or is pending transfer to a military installation within the state while on active military duty pursuant to an official military order.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “pupil” includes a pupil eligible for services or accommodations pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), or the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as applicable.(c) A school district shall accept applications by electronic means for enrollment, including enrollment in a specific school or program within the school district, and course registration for pupils described in subdivision (b).(d) (1) The parent shall provide proof of residence in the school district, including by using any of the documents described in subdivision (a) of Section 48204.1, within 10 days after the published arrival date provided on official documentation.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a parent may use any of the following addresses as related to their military move:(A) A temporary on-base billeting facility or off-base hotel.(B) A purchased or leased home or apartment.(C) Federal government or public-private venture on- or off-base military housing.(D) Other temporary housing.(e) Upon notification that a pupil enrolling pursuant to this section is receiving, or may be eligible to receive, services or accommodations pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), or the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as applicable, the school district shall promptly coordinate with the pupil’s parents and previous school pursuant to Section 56325 to ensure the timely exchange of records and to reduce any delays in the pupil receiving comparable services or accommodations from the school district, including, but not limited to, implementation of their individualized education program, individualized family service plan, or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), as applicable.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:The need to ensure timely enrollment of pupils when their enrollment changes as a result of their parent or guardian’s military service.